test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_nakkyyt_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - näkkyyt  - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     näkkyyt+V+Inf: näkkyyt
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nävyn
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nävyt
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näkkyy
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nävymä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nävyttä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nävythään
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nävyin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nävyit
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: näkyi
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nävyimä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nävyittä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nävythiin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: näkyny
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nävytty
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: näkynheet
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: näkkyyvä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: näkkyyvät
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nävyttävä
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nävyttävät
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: näkyisin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: näkyisit
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: näkyis
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: näkyisimmä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: näkyisittä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: nävyttäis
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+Cond: nävyttäis
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: nävy
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: näkykkää
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: näkymässä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: näkymästä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: näkymhään
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: näkymällä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: näkymättä
     
